pl: Typ klubu: Rębak; Sterownik; Fairway; Hybrydowy; Żelazo; Putter; Użyteczność; Wedge; Drewno; Inne
tr: Sopa Tipi: Pürüz giderici; Sürücü; Golf sahası; Hibrit; Demir; Atıcı; İşlevsel; Kama; Ahşap; Diğer
sk-SK: Typ golfových palív: Golfový Chipper; Golfový Driver; Golfový Fairway; Golfový Hybrid; Golfový Iron; Golfový Putter; Golfový Utility; Golfový Wedge; Golfový wood; Iné
vi: Loại gậy: Gậy chip; Gậy gỗ số 1; Gậy Fairway; Ván kết hợp; Sắt; Gậy Putter (Gậy gạt); Tiện ích; Gậy Wedge (Gậy kỹ thuật); Gỗ; Khác
nb: Klubbtype: Chipper; Driver; Fairway; Hybrid; Jern; Putter; Nytte; Wedge; Trevirke; Annet
de: Schlägertyp: Chipper; Driver; Fairway; Hybrid; Eisen; Putter; Utility; Wedge; Holz; Sonstiges
hu: Ütő típusa: Chipper; Driver; Fairway; Hibrid; Vasütő; Putter; Utility; Wedge; Faütő; Egyéb
pt-PT: Tipo de tacos: Corte; Condução; Fairway; Híbrido; Ferro; Taco; Utilitário; Cunha; Madeira; Outro
it: Tipo di mazza: Chipper; Driver; Fairway; Ibrido; Ferro; Putter; Utility; Wedge; Legno; Altro
el: Τύπος μπαστουνιού: Chipper; Driver; Fairway; Hybrid; Σίδερο; Putter; Utility; Wedge; Ξύλο; Άλλο
sl-SI: Vrsta palice: Chipper; Driver; Fairway; Hibrid; Železo; Putter; Utility; Wedge; Les; Drugo
ja: クラブの種類: チッパー; ドライバー; フェアウェイ; ハイブリッド; 鉄; パター; ユーティリティ; ウェッジ; 木材; その他
en: Club type: Chipper; Driver; Fairway; Hybrid; Iron; Putter; Utility; Wedge; Wood; Other
nl: Clubtype: Chipper; Driver; Fairway; Hybride; IJzer; Putter; Hulpmiddel; Wedge; Hout; Andere
zh-CN: 球杆类型: 起扑杆; 一号木杆; 平坦球道; 混合型; 铁; 推杆; 多功能型; 楔形; 木头; 其他
ru: Тип клюшки: Чиппер; Драйвер; Фэрвей; Гибридный; Айрон; Паттер; Утилитарный; Ведж; Дерево; Другое
da: Klubtype: Chipper; Driver; Fairway; Hybrid; Jern; Putter; Utility; Kølle; Træ; Andet
cs: Typ golfové hole: Chipper; Driver; Fairway; Hybridní; Železo; Putter; Užitkový; Wedge; Dřevo; Jiné
lt-LT: Lazdos tipas: „Chipper“ (trumpam žaidimui); „Driver“ (smūgio); „Fairway“; Hibridinė; „Iron“ (tiesių smūgių); „Putter“ (įridenimo); „Utility“ (atstumo); „Wedge“ (trumpo smūgio); Mediena; Kita
pt-BR: Tipo de clube: Chipper; Driver; Fairway; Híbrida; Ferro; Putter; Utilitário; Wedge; Madeira; Outro
es: Tipo de palo: Chipper; Madera número uno; Calle; Híbrido; Hierro; Putter; Utilidad; Cuña; Madera; Otros
zh-TW: 高爾夫球棒類型: 起撲桿; 開球木桿; 球道; 混合; 鐵; 推桿; 多功能; 挖起桿; 木材; 其他
sv: Klubbtyp: Flismaskin; Förare; Fairway; Hybrid; Järn; Putter; Verktyg; Wedge; Trä; Övrigt
fi: Kerhotyyppi: Chipper; Driver; Väylä; Hybridi; Rauta; Putteri; Hyötykäyttö; Wedge; Puu; Muu
fr: Type de clubs: Chipper; Driver; Fairway; Hybrid; Fer; Putter; Utilitaire; Wedge; Bois; Autre
hr-HR: Vrsta palice za golf: Chipper; Driver; Fairway; Hibridna; Željezo; Putter; Utility; Wedge; Drvo; Ostalo
bg-BG: Тип стикове: Чипър; Драйвър; Феъруей; Хибрид; Желязо; Пътър; Помощен; Клин; Дърво; Други
ro-RO: Tip crosă: Chipper; Driver; Fairway; Hybrid; Iron; Putter; Utility; Wedge; Wood; Altele
th: ประเภทคลับ: ชิปเปอร์; ไดรเวอร์; แฟร์เวย์; แบบไฮบริด; เหล็ก; พัตเตอร์; อเนกประสงค์; เวดจ์; ไม้; อื่นๆ
ko: 클럽 유형: 치퍼; 드라이버; 페어웨이; 하이브리드; 철; 퍼터; 유틸리티; 웨지; 목재; 기타